Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-5604
Department of Agriculture; calculate costs; report.

For each fiscal year beginning with FY2007-08, the Department of Agriculture shall calculate its costs in collecting and enforcing the excise tax imposed by section 2-5602 and shall report such costs to the Department of Administrative Services within thirty days after the end of the calendar quarter. Sufficient funds to cover such costs shall be transferred from the Winery and Grape Producers Promotional Fund to the Management Services Expense Revolving Fund at the end of each calendar quarter. Funds shall be transferred upon the receipt by the Department of Administrative Services of a report of costs incurred by the Department of Agriculture for the previous calendar quarter.

Laws 2007, LB441, § 5.